New York, session 2025-2026, A2397.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 2807 of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (g) to read as follows: 3 (g) The department in developing and revising an alternative payment 4 methodology for federally qualified health centers and rural health 5 clinics pursuant to section one of part FFF of chapter fifty-six of the 6 laws of two thousand twenty, as amended by section one of part C of 7 chapter fifty-seven of the laws of two thousand twenty-one, for such 8 covered entities as defined in section 340B of the federal public health 9 service act, 42 USC § 256b, for drugs that would otherwise be eligible 10 for pricing under section 340B of the federal public health service act, 11 shall also include the cost of all ovulation enhancing drugs dispensed 12 by such covered entities. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04741-01-5